Washington statutes.
RCW 7.48.240

Certain places of resort declared nuisances.

Houses of ill fame, kept for the purpose, where persons are employed for purposes of prostitution; all public houses or places of resort where gambling is carried on, or permitted; all houses or places within any city, town, or village, or upon any public road, or highway where drunkenness, gambling, fighting or breaches of the peace are carried on, or permitted; all opium dens, or houses, or places of resort where opium smoking is permitted, are nuisances, and may be abated, and the owners, keepers, or persons in charge thereof, and persons carrying on such unlawful business shall be punished as provided in this chapter.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 18; Code 1881 s 1247; 1875 p 81 s 13; RRS s 9924.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.